Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-146
Procuring, gathering, writing, editing, or disseminating news or other information; not required to disclose to courts or public.

No person engaged in procuring, gathering, writing, editing, or disseminating news or other information to the public shall be required to disclose in any federal or state proceeding:

(1) The source of any published or unpublished, broadcast or nonbroadcast information obtained in the gathering, receiving, or processing of information for any medium of communication to the public; or

(2) Any unpublished or nonbroadcast information obtained or prepared in gathering, receiving, or processing of information for any medium of communication to the public.

Laws 1973, LB 380, § 3.